Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 5

Commercial Real Estate Brokers

62-13-501. Part definitions — Form of notice.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Broker” has the same meaning as used in § 62-13-102;

“Commercial real estate” means any real estate other than:

Real estate containing one (1) to four (4) residential units; or

Real estate on which no buildings or structures are located and is zoned for no more than one (1) to four (4) family residential units;

“Commercial real estate” does not include single family residential units such as condominiums, town houses or homes in a subdivision when sold, leased or otherwise conveyed on a unit-by-unit basis even though these units may be a part of a larger building or parcel of real estate containing more than four (4) residential units;

“Notice” means a notice specifically referencing an agreement entered into after October 1, 1997, to pay commissions in any brokerage contract or lease or memorandum of the foregoing, sworn to and executed by the broker, identifying the subject real estate by lot and block number or by a metes and bounds description and in the form of notice set out in this subdivision (3) and containing only the information provided for in the form, recorded as provided for in § 62-13-503(e), in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the property is located, no less than ten (10) business days before the transfer of the commercial real estate that is the subject of the agreement. The form of the notice to be recorded shall be:

NOTICE OF AGREEMENT TO PAY LEASING COMMISSION

THIS NOTICE is made as of this day of , , in accordance with the provisions of T.C.A. Section 62-13-501. The undersigned [Name of Broker][address] makes claim to fees or commissions with respect to the following real property located in the State of Tennessee [property must be identified below by County and City (if any) and by either lot and block or subdivision number, or metes and bounds description].

County:

City:

Lot And Block No. or Subdivision/Development Name:

Property (Metes and Bounds) Description (either fill in here or attach Exhibit):

[The Broker], is entitled to be paid certain leasing fees or commissions as a result of securing a tenant for the real property from the above-described real property pursuant to one or more provisions of the following written instrument (the “Instrument”):

Name/Title of Instrument:

Date of Instrument:

Name of Parties to Instrument:

The Owner of the Property Is:

[NOTE: Any party seeking details or any other information regarding the Instrument shall rely only on the Instrument. Without the express written consent of all parties to the Instrument, neither the Instrument nor any other information regarding the Instrument shall be included in this Notice.]

THIS NOTICE made for the purpose set out above to be effective as of the day and date first above written.

STATE OF

COUNTY OF

The Undersigned Broker, being first duly sworn, hereby certifies that the foregoing Notice of Agreement to Pay Leasing Commission is true and correct, and that the agreement to pay leasing fees or commissions remains in force and has not been terminated.

This the day of ,

BROKER:

By:

Print Name:

Title:

[NOTE: Insert the appropriate acknowledgment form as required by law and have the broker's signature properly acknowledged.];

“Owner” means the person or persons to whom the fee interest of real estate is titled and does not include a lessee or renter;

“Real estate” means and includes leaseholds, as well as any other interest or estate in land, whether corporeal, incorporeal, freehold or nonfreehold, situated in this state; and

“Subsequent owner” means a transferee or purchaser of commercial real estate from the owner or from a previous subsequent owner, but will not include the transferee or purchaser of commercial real estate pursuant to a sale conducted pursuant to title 67, chapter 5, part 25.

Acts 1997, ch. 389, § 1; 2014, ch. 533, §§ 1, 2.

Law Reviews.

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce),32 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).

62-13-502. Enforcement of fee or commission contract against subsequent owners.

A broker who, pursuant to a contract in writing entered into after October 1, 1997, has earned and is owed a fee or commission with respect to a lease or upon the exercise of an option for renewal or expansion of the lease, whether payable over time or in a lump sum, from the owner of commercial real estate pursuant to such written contract for the broker's services in connection with a lease of commercial real estate, shall have a cause of action to enforce the contract with respect to the fee or commission against a subsequent owner, even though the subsequent owner is not a party to the contract, if and only if the subsequent owner has notice of the contract as provided in this part with respect to the fee before obtaining title to the commercial real estate. There shall be no prohibition against a broker giving the notice as required by this part, and any such prohibition is void and unenforceable.

Acts 1997, ch. 389, § 1; 2014, ch. 533, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 533, § 4 provided that § 3 of the act, which amended this section, shall apply to any cause of action for which the subsequent owner has notice on or after March 12, 2014, that fees or commissions are owing.

62-13-503. Obligation subject to original contract — Limitation of actions — Recording of notice.

The obligation of a subsequent owner shall be subject to the terms, conditions and defenses available to the contracting parties. A subsequent owner shall be liable for the fees or commissions only to the extent that the subsequent owner receives rents pursuant to leases with respect to which the broker is entitled to receive a fee or commission under the written contract referenced in the notice provided for in § 62-13-501.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to change any agreement between an owner and a subsequent owner or to release an owner from any liability to a broker for the fees or commissions or to restrict or prevent a third-party claim by a subsequent owner against an owner or a previous subsequent owner for indemnification against a claim made by a broker against a subsequent owner based on a liability of the owner or a previous subsequent owner to the broker.

A broker may enforce an obligation under this section against a subsequent owner by filing suit in a court having appropriate jurisdiction within the latter of the following but in no event more than ten (10) years after the recording of the notice:

One (1) year after the transfer of ownership from the owner or a previous subsequent owner to a subsequent owner; or

One (1) year after the claim for a fee or commission accrues.

A notice containing only the information provided in § 62-13-501 may be recorded pursuant to this part in the office of the register of deeds in the county where the property is located, and the register of deeds shall accept the notice for recording. After the notice is recorded, the person who tendered it for recording shall promptly deliver a copy to the owner of the subject commercial real estate. Delivery may be by personal delivery, certified mail or any delivery service that provides proof of delivery.

Any notice that may be recorded pursuant to this part shall be deemed to be authenticated and eligible for recordation only if the notice conforms to the requirements of § 62-13-501. The register of deeds will index this recorded notice under the name of the owner identified in the notice and shall index the recorded notice in the reverse index under the name of the broker who is a party to the document.

Upon a written request by the owner or subsequent owner of the subject commercial real estate, made after all fee or commission rights, with respect to which a notice has been recorded under this part, have been paid in full or have otherwise been discharged, expired or otherwise are no longer enforceable under applicable law, the broker who recorded the notice or that broker's successor in interest shall record a release of that notice with the register of deeds for the county where that notice was recorded.

This part shall not be construed to create a lien on any commercial real estate to which this part applies.

Acts 1997, ch. 389, § 1.

62-13-504. Attorney fees and court costs.

The prevailing party in any litigation seeking to enforce the cause of action granted in § 62-13-502 or in seeking to recover damages or other relief for the wrongful refusal or failure to release the notice as required by § 62-13-503(f) shall be entitled to recover attorney fees and court costs incurred by reason of the litigation from the nonprevailing party.

Acts 1997, ch. 389, § 1.

62-13-505. Immunity of title examiners, title insurers, abstracters and closing agents.

No title examiner, title insurer, abstracter or closing agent shall have any responsibility or liability related to the contents of any document that is the subject of a notice recorded pursuant to this part so long as the title examiner, title insurer, abstractor or closing agent fulfills its obligations, if any, under existing law and its contract to disclose in its title report, abstract, commitment or policy the existence of the notice.

Acts 1997, ch. 389, § 1.